Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.64.180

Disinfection of property.

Every code city shall disinfect or destroy all infected trees or shrubs growing upon public property within the city's jurisdiction and may expend city funds in carrying out the provisions of this section, and shall otherwise be governed by the provisions of chapter 15.08 RCW relating to horticultural pests and diseases.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.64.180.]